Louisiana, session 2025s1, HB1.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part I-B of Chapter 5 of Title 18 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 18:419.1 and 419.2, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART I-B. SPECIAL PROVISIONS FOR CERTAIN ELECTIONS HELD IN 2026
§419.1. Applicability of Part
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the provisions
contained in this Part shall be applicable in 2026 to the spring elections for municipal
and ward officers, for candidates in a party primary election for a party primary
office, and for other elections held at the same time. It is the intent of the Legislature
of Louisiana that the spring primary election occur on May 16, 2026, instead of April
18, 2026, and that the spring general election occur on June 27, 2026, instead of May
30, 2026. All other dates and deadlines related to the spring elections as provided
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 251ES-7 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1
for in this Code and not otherwise specifically provided for in this Part shall be
calculated based upon the dates provided for in this Part.
§419.2. Spring elections in 2026
A. Notwithstanding R.S. 18:402(C)(1) or 410.10 or any other provision of
law to the contrary, the following dates shall apply for the spring elections in 2026:
(1) There shall be a spring primary election held on May 16, 2026, for
municipal and ward officers elected in the spring of a nonpresidential congressional
election year and for candidates in a party primary election for a party primary office
to be elected in that year. Any contest, proposition, question, or constitutional
amendment scheduled to appear on the ballot for the April 18, 2026, election shall
instead appear on the ballot for the May 16, 2026, election.
(2) There shall be a spring general election held on June 27, 2026, for
municipal and ward officers and, if necessary, a second party primary for candidates
in a party primary election for a party primary office to be elected that year. Any
contest, proposition, or question scheduled to appear on the ballot for the May 30,
2026, election shall instead appear on the ballot for the June 27, 2026, election.
B.(1) Notwithstanding R.S. 18:467 or any other provision of law to the
contrary, the qualifying period for candidates for the spring primary election in 2026
and for all candidates for a party primary office to be elected in 2026, and those in
any special primary election to be held at the same time, shall open on February 11,
2026.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding R.S. 18:410.5 or 465(B) or any other provision of law
to the contrary, any signature collected on or after September 16, 2025, on a
nominating petition for an office for which qualifying opens on February 11, 2026,
shall be considered timely.
(b) Notwithstanding R.S. 18:465(C)(3)(b), the number of qualified voters
who must timely sign a nominating petition for a candidate for United States
representative in Congress to be elected in 2026 is seven hundred fifty from within
the state.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 251ES-7 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1
(c) Notwithstanding R.S. 18:465(C)(1), the number of qualified voters who
must timely sign a nominating petition for a candidate for United States senator to
be elected in 2026 is two thousand five hundred from within the state.
C.(1) Notwithstanding R.S. 18:1491.6(B)(1), each committee which is
participating in the election of a candidate for major office in the May 16, 2026,
election, excluding a candidate for party primary office, shall file a report as required
by R.S. 18:1491.6 no later than November 20, 2025, which shall be complete
through the one hundred ninetieth day prior to the May 16, 2026, election. However,
it shall not be a violation of Chapter 11 of this Title for a committee to fail to file
such a report prior to November 20, 2025.
(2) Notwithstanding R.S. 18:1495.4(B)(1), each candidate for major office
in the May 16, 2026, election, excluding a candidate for party primary office, shall
file a report as required by R.S. 18:1495.4 no later than November 20, 2025, which
shall be complete through the one hundred ninetieth day prior to the May 16, 2026,
election. However, it shall not be a violation of Chapter 11 of this Title for a
candidate to fail to file such a report prior to November 20, 2025.
(3) A candidate who is required to file a supplemental report by February 15,
2026, pursuant to R.S. 18:1495.4(D)(3)(b) shall instead file the supplemental report
by March 2, 2026.
(4) A candidate who is required to file an annual report by February 15,
2026, pursuant to R.S. 18:1495.4(E) shall instead file the annual report by March 2,
2026.
D.(1) The secretary of state may make necessary changes to any rules,
regulations, forms, instructions, statements, ballots, nominating petitions, early
voting ballot instructions, or absentee by mail ballot envelopes, instructions,
certificates, or other balloting paraphernalia to reflect the dates and deadlines
provided for in this Part without approval as otherwise required by R.S. 18:18, 423,
431, 552, or 1306.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 251ES-7 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1
(2) The secretary of state may proceed with emergency rulemaking pursuant
to R.S. 49:962 if necessary to implement the provisions of this Part.
Section 2. The change of election dates as provided in this Act shall not be construed
to invalidate any action undertaken by the governing authority of a political subdivision in
an effort to place a bond, debt, tax, or proposition election or other question to be presented
to the voters on either the April 16, 2026, or May 30, 2026, ballot. Any notice, resolution,
proclamation, or certification that states either the April 16, 2026, or May 30, 2026, election
date shall not be invalidated for failure to state the May 16, 2026, or June 27, 2026, election
date as provided for in this Act.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.